New York, session 2025-2026, A5567.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 730.10 of the criminal procedure 2 law is amended to read as follows: 3 1. "Incapacitated person" means a defendant who as a result of mental 4 disease or defect lacks capacity to understand the proceedings against 5 [him] such defendant or to assist in [his] their own defense. 6 § 2. Subdivision 8 of section 730.10 of the criminal procedure law, as 7 separately amended by chapters 615 and 629 of the laws of 1974, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 8. "Examination report" means a report made by a psychiatric examiner 10 wherein [he] such examiner sets forth [his] their opinion as to whether 11 the defendant is or is not an incapacitated person, the nature and 12 extent of [his] their examination and, if [he or she finds] they find 13 that the defendant is an incapacitated person, [his] their diagnosis and 14 prognosis and a detailed statement of the reasons for [his] their opin- 15 ion by making particular reference to those aspects of the proceedings 16 wherein the defendant lacks capacity to understand or to assist in [his] 17 their own defense. The report must also state the examiner's profes- 18 sional opinion as to whether or not there is at least a reasonable 19 expectation that restoration services could have a substantial probabil- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01866-04-6 A. 5567--B 2 1 ity of restoring the defendant to competence within a reasonable period 2 of time. The state administrator and the commissioner must jointly adopt 3 the form of the examination report; and the state administrator shall 4 prescribe the number of copies thereof that must be submitted to the 5 court by the director. 6 § 3. Section 730.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by adding 7 a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 8 10. "Restoration services" means those services which may include 9 medication support, classroom-based competency instruction, mock trials, 10 symptom management, and rehabilitative services provided to an incapaci- 11 tated person which are designed to improve their mental state or devel- 12 opmental status to the extent that they can understand the charges 13 against them and participate in their own defense. Restoration services 14 may supplement mental health treatment aimed at recovery from mental 15 illness or services aimed at improving a developmentally disabled 16 person's ability to function on a day-to-day basis. 17 § 4. Section 730.20 of the criminal procedure law, subdivisions 1 and 18 5 as amended by chapter 693 of the laws of 1989 and subdivision 7 as 19 amended by chapter 692 of the laws of 1972, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 § 730.20 Fitness to proceed; generally. 22 1. [The appropriate director to whom a criminal court issues an order 23 of examination must be determined in accordance with rules jointly 24 adopted by the judicial conference and the commissioner.] Upon receipt 25 of an examination order, the director to whom the court has issued an 26 order must designate two qualified psychiatric examiners, of whom [he] 27 such director may be one, to examine the defendant to determine if [he] 28 the defendant is an incapacitated person. In conducting their examina- 29 tion, the psychiatric examiners [may] shall employ [any] a method [which 30 is accepted by the medical profession for the examination of persons 31 alleged to be mentally ill or mentally defective] as set forth in stand- 32 ards set by agreement between the director and the commissioner to 33 determine if the defendant is an incapacitated person. The court may 34 authorize a psychiatrist or psychologist retained by the defendant to be 35 present at such examination. 36 2. When the defendant is not in custody at the time a court issues an 37 order of examination, because [he] the defendant was theretofore 38 released on bail or on [his] the defendant's own recognizance, the court 39 [may] shall direct that the examination be conducted on an out-patient 40 basis, and at such time and place as the director shall designate and 41 the court shall order the defendant to appear for such examination. If, 42 however, the director informs the court that hospital confinement of the 43 defendant is necessary for an effective examination, the court may 44 direct that the defendant be confined in a hospital [designated by the 45 director] operated or approved by the commissioner only until the exam- 46 ination is completed. In no event shall the need for such examination be 47 a basis for incarcerating a defendant who has been released on bail or 48 their own recognizance. 49 3. When the defendant is in custody at the time a court issues an 50 order of examination, the examination must be conducted at the place 51 where the defendant is being held in custody. If, however, the director 52 determines that hospital confinement of the defendant is necessary for 53 an effective examination, the sheriff must deliver the defendant to a 54 hospital designated by the [director] commissioner and hold [him] the 55 defendant in custody therein, under sufficient guard, until the examina- 56 tion is completed. A. 5567--B 3 1 4. Hospital confinement under subdivisions two and three shall be for 2 a period not exceeding [thirty] ten days, except that, upon application 3 of the director, the court may authorize confinement for an additional 4 period not exceeding [thirty] ten days if it is satisfied that a longer 5 period is necessary to complete the examination. During the period of 6 hospital confinement, the physician in charge of the hospital may admin- 7 ister or cause to be administered to the defendant such emergency 8 psychiatric, medical or other therapeutic treatment as in [his] such 9 physician's judgment should be administered. 10 5. Each psychiatric examiner, after [he has completed his] completing 11 the examination of the defendant, must promptly prepare and submit to 12 the director an examination report [and submit it to the director] 13 setting forth the examiner's opinion as to whether or not there is at 14 least a reasonable expectation that restoration services could have a 15 substantial probability of restoring the defendant to competence within 16 a reasonable period of time. If the psychiatric examiners are not unani- 17 mous in their opinion as to whether the defendant is or is not an inca- 18 pacitated person, the director must designate another qualified psychi- 19 atric examiner to examine the defendant to determine if [he] the 20 defendant is an incapacitated person and, if so, whether or not there is 21 at least a reasonable expectation that restoration services could have a 22 substantial probability of restoring the defendant to competence within 23 a reasonable period of time. Upon receipt of the examination reports, 24 the director must submit them to the court that issued the order of 25 examination. The court must furnish a copy of the reports to counsel 26 for the defendant and to the district attorney. 27 6. When a defendant is subjected to examination pursuant to an order 28 issued by a criminal court in accordance with this article, any state- 29 ment made by [him] such defendant for the purpose of the examination or 30 treatment shall be inadmissible in evidence against [him] such defendant 31 in any criminal action on any issue other than that of [his] such 32 defendant's mental condition[, but such statement is admissible upon 33 that issue whether or not it would otherwise be deemed a privileged 34 communication]. 35 7. A psychiatric examiner, who is not regularly employed by the coun- 36 ty, state, or city of New York, is entitled to [his] their reasonable 37 traveling expenses[, a] and to a reasonable fee [of fifty dollars] to be 38 negotiated with the examiner by the director or the county or, if no 39 such fee is agreed upon, to be set by the court for each examination of 40 a defendant and [a fee of fifty dollars] for each appearance at a court 41 hearing or trial [but not exceeding two hundred dollars in fees for 42 examination and testimony in any one case]; except that if such psychi- 43 atric examiner be an employee of the county or of the state of New York 44 [he] they shall be entitled only to reasonable traveling expenses, 45 unless such psychiatric examiner makes the examination or appears at a 46 court hearing or trial outside [his] their hours of state or county 47 employment in a county in which the director of community [mental 48 health] services certifies to the fiscal officer thereof that there is a 49 shortage of qualified [psychiatrists] examiners available to conduct 50 examinations under [the criminal procedure law] this chapter in such 51 county, in which event [he] such examiner shall be entitled to [the 52 foregoing] such fees and reasonable traveling expenses as approved by 53 the court. Such fees and traveling expenses and the costs of sending a 54 defendant to another place of detention or to a hospital for examina- 55 tion[, of his maintenance therein] and the cost of returning [him] the 56 defendant shall, when approved and so ordered by the court, be a charge A. 5567--B 4 1 of the county in which the defendant is being tried, and the cost of the 2 maintenance of such defendant therein shall be a cost to the state. 3 § 5. Section 730.30 of the criminal procedure law, subdivision 3 as 4 amended by chapter 629 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 730.30 Fitness to proceed; order of examination. 7 1. At any time after a defendant is arraigned upon an accusatory 8 instrument other than a felony complaint and before the imposition of 9 sentence, or at any time after a defendant is arraigned upon a felony 10 complaint and before [he] such defendant is held for the action of the 11 grand jury, or upon arraignment on an indictment by a grand jury, the 12 court wherein the criminal action is pending [must] may issue an order 13 of examination when it [is of the opinion] has a reasonable basis to 14 believe that the defendant may be an incapacitated person. 15 2. When the examination reports submitted to the court show that each 16 psychiatric examiner is of the opinion that the defendant is not an 17 incapacitated person, the court may, on its own motion, conduct a hear- 18 ing to determine the issue of capacity, and it must conduct a hearing 19 upon motion therefor by the defendant or by the district attorney. If 20 the court does not decide to hold a hearing on its own motion and no 21 motion for a hearing is made, or if, following a hearing the court is 22 satisfied that the defendant is not an incapacitated person, the crimi- 23 nal action against the defendant must proceed. [If, following a hearing, 24 the court is satisfied that the defendant is not an incapacitated 25 person, the criminal action against him must proceed; if the court is 26 not so satisfied, it must issue a further order of examination directing 27 that the defendant be examined by different psychiatric examiners desig- 28 nated by the director.] 29 3. When the examination reports submitted to the court show that each 30 psychiatric examiner is of the opinion that the defendant is an incapac- 31 itated person and that there is at least a reasonable expectation that 32 restoration services could have a substantial probability of restoring 33 the defendant to competence within a reasonable period of time, the 34 court [may, on its own motion,] may conduct a hearing to determine the 35 issue of capacity [and it must conduct such hearing upon motion therefor 36 by the defendant or by the district attorney]. 37 4. When the examination reports submitted to the court show that the 38 psychiatric examiners are not unanimous in their opinion as to whether 39 the defendant is or is not an incapacitated person[, or when the exam- 40 ination reports submitted to the superior court show that the psychiat- 41 ric examiners are not unanimous in their opinion as to whether the 42 defendant is or is not a dangerous incapacitated person] and that there 43 is at least a reasonable expectation that restoration services could 44 have a substantial probability of restoring the defendant to competence 45 within a reasonable period of time, the court must conduct a hearing to 46 determine the issue of capacity [or dangerousness] and expectation of 47 restoration within a reasonable time. 48 § 6. Subdivision 1 of section 730.40 of the criminal procedure law, as 49 amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 50 1. When a local criminal court, following a hearing conducted pursuant 51 to subdivision two, three or four of section 730.30 of this article, is 52 satisfied that the defendant is not an incapacitated person, the crimi- 53 nal action against [him or her] such defendant must proceed. If [it] a 54 local criminal court accusatory instrument other than a felony complaint 55 has been filed against the defendant and the court is satisfied that the 56 defendant is an incapacitated person, [or if no motion for such a hear- A. 5567--B 5 1 ing is made, such court must issue a final or temporary order of obser- 2 vation committing him or her to the custody of the commissioner for care 3 and treatment in an appropriate institution for a period not to exceed 4 ninety days from the date of the order, provided, however, that the 5 commissioner may designate an appropriate hospital for placement of a 6 defendant for whom a final order of observation has been issued, where 7 such hospital is licensed by the office of mental health and has agreed 8 to accept, upon referral by the commissioner, defendants subject to 9 final orders of observation issued under this subdivision. When a local 10 criminal court accusatory instrument other than a felony complaint has 11 been filed against the defendant,] such court must issue a final order 12 of observation. When a felony complaint has been filed against the 13 defendant, such court must issue a temporary order of observation 14 committing [him or her] such defendant to the custody of the commission- 15 er for [care and treatment] restoration services in an appropriate 16 institution or, [upon the consent of the district attorney] in the 17 discretion of the court, committing [him or her] such defendant to the 18 custody of the commissioner for [care and treatment] restoration 19 services on an out-patient basis, for a period not to exceed ninety days 20 from the date of such order[, except that, with the consent of the 21 district attorney,] or it may issue a final order of observation. Upon 22 the issuance of a final order of observation, the district attorney 23 shall immediately transmit to the commissioner, in a manner intended to 24 protect the confidentiality of the information, a list of names and 25 contact information of persons who may reasonably be expected to be the 26 victim of any assault or any violent felony offense, as defined in the 27 penal law, or any offense listed in section 530.11 of this [chapter] 28 part which would be carried out by the committed person; provided that 29 the person who reasonably may be expected to be a victim does not need 30 to be a member of the same family or household as the committed person. 31 § 7. Section 730.50 of the criminal procedure law, subdivision 1 as 32 amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2013, subdivision 2 as amended by 33 chapter 789 of the laws of 1985, subdivision 5 as amended by chapter 629 34 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as follows: 35 § 730.50 Fitness to proceed; indictment. 36 1. When a superior court, following a hearing conducted pursuant to 37 subdivision two, three or four of section 730.30 of this article, is 38 satisfied that the defendant is not an incapacitated person, the crimi- 39 nal action against [him or her] such defendant must proceed. If [it is 40 satisfied] after a hearing, the court makes a finding that the defendant 41 is an incapacitated person, [or if no motion for such a hearing is made] 42 and that there is at least a reasonable expectation that restoration 43 services could have a substantial probability of restoring the defendant 44 to competence within a reasonable period of time, it must adjudicate 45 [him or her] them an incapacitated person[, and must issue a final order 46 of observation or an order of commitment]. When the indictment does not 47 charge a felony or when the defendant has been convicted of an offense 48 other than a felony, such court (a) must issue a final order of observa- 49 tion [committing the defendant to the custody of the commissioner for 50 care and treatment in an appropriate institution for a period not to 51 exceed ninety days from the date of such order, provided, however, that 52 the commissioner may designate an appropriate hospital for placement of 53 a defendant for whom a final order of observation has been issued, where 54 such hospital is licensed by the office of mental health and has agreed 55 to accept, upon referral by the commissioner, defendants subject to 56 final orders of observation issued under this subdivision], and (b) must A. 5567--B 6 1 dismiss the indictment filed in such court against the defendant, and 2 such dismissal constitutes a bar to any further prosecution of the 3 charge or charges contained in such indictment. Upon the issuance of a 4 final order of observation, the district attorney shall immediately 5 transmit to the commissioner, in a manner intended to protect the confi- 6 dentiality of the information, a list of names and contact information 7 of persons who may reasonably be expected to be the victim of any 8 assault or any violent felony offense, as defined in the penal law, or 9 any offense listed in section 530.11 of this [chapter] part which would 10 be carried out by the committed person; provided that the person who 11 reasonably may be expected to be a victim does not need to be a member 12 of the same family or household as the committed person. When the 13 indictment charges a felony [or when the defendant has been convicted of 14 a felony] and the court has determined that there is at least a reason- 15 able expectation that restoration services could have a substantial 16 probability of restoring the defendant to competence within a reasonable 17 period of time, it must issue an order of commitment committing the 18 defendant to the custody of the commissioner [for care and treatment] to 19 receive restoration services in an appropriate institution or[, upon the 20 consent of the district attorney,] committing [him or her] such defend- 21 ant to the custody of the commissioner for care and treatment on an 22 out-patient basis, for a period not to exceed [one year] ninety days 23 from the date of such order. Upon the issuance of an order of commit- 24 ment, the court must exonerate the defendant's bail if [he or she was] 25 they were previously at liberty on bail; provided, however, that exoner- 26 ation of bail is not required when a defendant is committed to the 27 custody of the commissioner for care and treatment on an out-patient 28 basis. [When the defendant is in the custody of the commissioner pursu- 29 ant to a final order of observation, the commissioner or his or her 30 designee, which may include the director of an appropriate institution, 31 immediately upon the discharge of the defendant, must certify to such 32 court that he or she has complied with the notice provisions set forth 33 in paragraph (a) of subdivision six of section 730.60 of this article] 34 In the event that the court determines there is not a reasonable expec- 35 tation that restoration services could have a substantial probability of 36 restoring the defendant to competence within a reasonable period of time 37 the matter shall be referred to the supreme court for a hearing 38 conducted in accordance with section 9.33 or 15.31 of the mental 39 hygiene law. 40 2. When a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner immediately 41 prior to the expiration of the period prescribed in a temporary order of 42 commitment and the superintendent of the institution wherein the defend- 43 ant is confined is of the opinion that the defendant continues to be an 44 incapacitated person, such superintendent must apply to the court that 45 issued such order for an order of retention for an additional period of 46 ninety days. The court must hold a hearing on this application to 47 determine if there is a substantial probability of recovery in the fore- 48 seeable future. If the court determines that there is such reasonable 49 expectation of restoration, it shall issue an order of retention for an 50 additional ninety days. If the court finds that the defendant is still 51 incapacitated and there is not a substantial probability of restoration 52 in the foreseeable future, it shall refer the matter to the civil 53 section of the supreme court in the county where the defendant's case is 54 pending, for a hearing pursuant to article nine or fifteen of the mental 55 hygiene law to determine if the defendant shall be hospitalized or 56 otherwise retained on an involuntary basis. [Such application must be A. 5567--B 7 1 made within sixty days prior to the expiration of such period on forms 2 that have been jointly adopted by the judicial conference and the 3 commissioner.] The superintendent must give written notice of the appli- 4 cation for such order to the defendant and to the mental hygiene legal 5 service. Upon receipt of such application, the court [may, on its own 6 motion,] shall conduct a hearing [to determine the issue of capacity, 7 and it must conduct such hearing if a demand therefor is made by the 8 defendant or the mental hygiene legal service within ten days from the 9 date that notice of the application was given them. If, at the conclu- 10 sion of a hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision, the court is 11 satisfied that the defendant is no longer an incapacitated person, the 12 criminal action against him must proceed. If it is satisfied that the 13 defendant continues to be an incapacitated person, or if no demand for a 14 hearing is made, the court must adjudicate him an incapacitated person 15 and must issue an order of retention which shall authorize continued 16 custody of the defendant by the commissioner for a period not to exceed 17 one year] pursuant to the provisions of article nine or fifteen of the 18 mental hygiene law and the court shall order that the defendant shall be 19 maintained in the custody of the commissioner but transferred to a 20 hospital or other appropriate institution to be involuntarily admitted 21 pursuant to article nine or fifteen of the mental hygiene law subject 22 to the retention provisions of section 9.33 or 15.31 of the mental 23 hygiene law except as specifically provided herein. Such order shall 24 not be deemed in any way to be the order of a criminal court. 25 3. [When] Before a defendant is [in] released from the custody of the 26 commissioner [immediately prior to the expiration of the period 27 prescribed in the first order of retention, the procedure set forth in 28 subdivision two shall govern the application for and the issuance of any 29 subsequent order of retention, except that any subsequent orders of 30 retention must be for periods not to exceed two years each; provided, 31 however,] either pursuant to this section or pursuant to article nine or 32 fifteen of the mental hygiene law, the court shall hold a hearing to 33 determine whether or not the defendant continues to be an incapacitated 34 person. If, at the conclusion of a hearing conducted pursuant to this 35 subdivision, the court is satisfied that the defendant is no longer an 36 incapacitated person, the criminal action against them must proceed 37 except that the court shall have the discretion to dismiss the case in 38 the interests of justice. If, at the conclusion of a hearing conducted 39 pursuant to this subdivision, the court finds that the defendant contin- 40 ues to be an incapacitated person then the court shall make an order in 41 accordance with section 9.33 or 15.31 of the mental hygiene law. In any 42 case that the aggregate of periods prescribed in the temporary order of 43 commitment[, the first order of retention and all subsequent orders of 44 retention] and any order of retention pursuant to this article or arti- 45 cle nine or fifteen of the mental hygiene law must not exceed two-thirds 46 of the authorized maximum term of imprisonment for the highest class 47 felony charged in the indictment [or for the highest class felony of 48 which he was convicted]. 49 4. When a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner either at 50 the expiration of the authorized period prescribed in the last order of 51 retention or any order of retention issued pursuant to article nine or 52 fifteen of the mental hygiene law, the criminal action pending against 53 [him] such defendant in the superior court that issued such order shall 54 terminate for all purposes, and the commissioner must promptly certify 55 to such court and to the appropriate district attorney that the defend- 56 ant was in [his] their custody on such expiration date. Upon receipt of A. 5567--B 8 1 such certification, the court must dismiss the indictment, and such 2 dismissal constitutes a bar to any further prosecution of the charge or 3 charges contained in such indictment. 4 [5. When, on the effective date of this subdivision, any defendant 5 remains in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to an order issued 6 under former code of criminal procedure section six hundred sixty-two-b, 7 the superintendent or director of the institution where such defendant 8 is confined shall, if he believes that the defendant continues to be an 9 incapacitated person, apply forthwith to a court of record in the county 10 where the institution is located for an order of retention. The proce- 11 dures for obtaining any order pursuant to this subdivision shall be in 12 accordance with the provisions of subdivisions two, three and four of 13 this section, except that the period of retention pursuant to the first 14 order obtained under this subdivision shall be for not more than one 15 year and any subsequent orders of retention must be for periods not to 16 exceed two years each; provided, however, that the aggregate of the time 17 spent in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to any order issued in 18 accordance with the provisions of former code of criminal procedure 19 section six hundred sixty-two-b and the periods prescribed by the first 20 order obtained under this subdivision and all subsequent orders of 21 retention must not exceed two-thirds of the authorized maximum term of 22 imprisonment for the highest class felony charged in the indictment or 23 the highest class felony of which he was convicted.] 24 § 8. Section 730.60 of the criminal procedure law, subdivisions 1 and 25 3 as amended by chapter 231 of the laws of 2008, subdivision 2 as 26 amended by chapter 57 of the laws of 1984, subdivisions 4 and 5 as 27 renumbered by chapter 629 of the laws of 1974, subdivision 6 as added by 28 chapter 549 of the laws of 1980 and paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivi- 29 sion 6 as amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read 30 as follows: 31 § 730.60 Fitness to proceed; procedure following custody by commission- 32 er. 33 1. When a local criminal court issues a [final or] temporary order of 34 observation or an order of commitment, it must forward such order and a 35 copy of the examination reports and the accusatory instrument to the 36 commissioner[, and, if available, a copy of the pre-sentence report]. 37 Upon receipt thereof, the commissioner must designate an appropriate 38 institution operated by the department of mental hygiene in which the 39 defendant is to be placed[, provided, however, that the commissioner may 40 designate an appropriate hospital for placement of a defendant for whom 41 a final order of observation has been issued, where such hospital is 42 licensed by the office of mental health and has agreed to accept, upon 43 referral by the commissioner, defendants subject to final orders of 44 observation issued under this subdivision]. The sheriff [must hold the 45 defendant in custody pending such designation by the commissioner, and] 46 when notified of the designation, [the sheriff] must deliver the defend- 47 ant to the superintendent of such institution. The superintendent must 48 promptly inform the appropriate director of the mental hygiene legal 49 service of the defendant's admission to such institution. If a defendant 50 escapes from the custody of the commissioner, the escape shall interrupt 51 the period prescribed in any order of observation, commitment or 52 retention, and such interruption shall continue until the defendant is 53 returned to the custody of the commissioner. 54 2. Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions four and five of this 55 section, when a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner pursuant 56 to a temporary order of observation or an order of commitment or an A. 5567--B 9 1 order of retention, the criminal action pending against the defendant in 2 the court that issued such order is suspended [until] pending further 3 order of the court. If the superintendent of the institution in which 4 the defendant is confined determines that [he] such defendant is no 5 longer an incapacitated person[. In that event], the court that issued 6 such order and the appropriate district attorney must be notified, in 7 writing, by the superintendent of [his] their determination. The court 8 must thereupon proceed in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 9 two of section 730.30 of this [chapter] article; provided, however, if 10 the court is satisfied that the defendant remains an incapacitated 11 person, and upon consent of all parties, the court may order the return 12 of the defendant to the institution in which [he] they had been confined 13 for such period of time as was authorized by the prior order of commit- 14 ment or order of retention. Upon such return, the defendant shall have 15 all rights and privileges accorded by the provisions of this article. 16 3. When a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to 17 an order issued in accordance with this article, the commissioner may 18 transfer [him] such defendant to any appropriate institution operated by 19 the department of mental hygiene, provided, however, that the commis- 20 sioner may designate an appropriate hospital for placement of a defend- 21 ant for whom a final order of observation has been issued, where such 22 hospital is licensed by the office of mental health and has agreed to 23 accept, upon referral by the commissioner, defendants subject to final 24 orders of observation issued under this section. The commissioner may 25 discharge a defendant in [his] their custody under a final order of 26 observation at any time prior to the expiration date of such order, or 27 otherwise treat or transfer such defendant in the same manner as if [he] 28 such defendant were a patient not in confinement under a criminal court 29 order. 30 4. When a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to 31 an order of commitment or an order of retention, [he] they may make any 32 motion authorized by this chapter which is susceptible of fair determi- 33 nation without [his] their personal participation. If the court denies 34 any such motion it must be without prejudice to a renewal thereof after 35 the criminal action against the defendant has been ordered to proceed. 36 If the court enters an order dismissing the indictment and does not 37 direct that the charge or charges be resubmitted to a grand jury, the 38 court must direct that such order of dismissal be served upon the 39 commissioner. 40 5. When a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to 41 an order of commitment or an order of retention, the superior court that 42 issued such order may, upon motion of the defendant, and with the 43 consent of the district attorney, dismiss the indictment when the court 44 is satisfied that (a) the defendant is a resident or citizen of another 45 state or country and that [he] they will be removed thereto upon 46 dismissal of the indictment, or (b) the defendant has been continuously 47 confined in the custody of the commissioner, either pursuant to this 48 article or pursuant to article nine or fifteen of the mental hygiene 49 law, for a period of more than two years. Before granting a motion 50 under this subdivision, the court must be further satisfied that 51 dismissal of the indictment is consistent with the ends of justice and 52 that custody of the defendant by the commissioner pursuant to an order 53 of commitment or an order of retention is not necessary for the 54 protection of the public and that care and treatment can be effectively 55 administered to the defendant without the necessity of such order. If 56 the court enters an order of dismissal under this subdivision, it must A. 5567--B 10 1 set forth in the record the reasons for such action, and must direct 2 that such order of dismissal be served upon the commissioner. The 3 dismissal of an indictment pursuant to this subdivision constitutes a 4 bar to any further prosecution of the charge or charges contained in 5 such indictment. 6 [6. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person commit- 7 ted to the custody of the commissioner pursuant to this article, or 8 continuously thereafter retained in such custody, shall be discharged, 9 released on condition or placed in any less secure facility or on any 10 less restrictive status, including, but not limited to vacations, 11 furloughs and temporary passes, unless the commissioner or his or her 12 designee, which may include the director of an appropriate institution, 13 shall deliver written notice, at least four days, excluding Saturdays, 14 Sundays and holidays, in advance of the change of such committed 15 person's facility or status, or in the case of a person committed pursu- 16 ant to a final order of observation written notice upon discharge of 17 such committed person, to all of the following: 18 (1) The district attorney of the county from which such person was 19 committed; 20 (2) The superintendent of state police; 21 (3) The sheriff of the county where the facility is located; 22 (4) The police department having jurisdiction of the area where the 23 facility is located; 24 (5) Any person who may reasonably be expected to be the victim of any 25 assault or any violent felony offense, as defined in the penal law, or 26 any offense listed in section 530.11 of this part which would be carried 27 out by the committed person; provided that the person who reasonably may 28 be expected to be a victim does not need to be a member of the same 29 family or household as the committed person; and 30 (6) Any other person the court may designate. 31 Said notice may be given by any means reasonably calculated to give 32 prompt actual notice. 33 (b) The notice required by this subdivision shall also be given imme- 34 diately upon the departure of such committed person from the actual 35 custody of the commissioner or an appropriate institution, without prop- 36 er authorization. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to 37 impair any other right or duty regarding any notice or hearing contained 38 in any other provision of law. 39 (c) Whenever a district attorney has received the notice described in 40 this subdivision, and the defendant is in the custody of the commission- 41 er pursuant to a final order of observation or an order of commitment, 42 he may apply within three days of receipt of such notice to a superior 43 court, for an order directing a hearing to be held to determine whether 44 such committed person is a danger to himself or others. Such hearing 45 shall be held within ten days following the issuance of such order. Such 46 order may provide that there shall be no further change in the committed 47 person's facility or status until the hearing. Upon a finding that the 48 committed person is a danger to himself or others, the court shall issue 49 an order to the commissioner authorizing retention of the committed 50 person in the status existing at the time notice was given hereunder, 51 for a specified period, not to exceed six months. The district attorney 52 and the committed person's attorney shall be entitled to the committed 53 person's clinical records in the commissioner's custody, upon the issu- 54 ance of an order directing a hearing to be held. A. 5567--B 11 1 (d) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impair any other 2 right or duty regarding any notice or hearing contained in any other 3 provision of law.] 4 § 9. Section 730.70 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chap- 5 ter 629 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 730.70 Fitness to proceed; procedure following termination of custody 7 by commissioner. 8 When a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner on the expira- 9 tion date of a final or temporary order of observation or an order of 10 commitment, or on the expiration date of the last order of retention, or 11 on the date an order dismissing an indictment is served upon the commis- 12 sioner, the superintendent of the institution in which the defendant is 13 confined may retain [him] such defendant for care and treatment for a 14 period of no more than thirty days from such date. If [the] during such 15 time two psychiatric examiners engaged by the superintendent [deter- 16 mines] determine that the defendant is so mentally ill or mentally 17 defective as to require continued care and treatment in an institution, 18 [he] the superintendent may, before the expiration of such thirty day 19 period, apply for an order of [certification] retention in the manner 20 prescribed in section [31.33] 9.33 or 15.33 of the mental hygiene law. 21 § 10. Subdivision (a) of section 9.33 of the mental hygiene law, as 22 amended by chapter 789 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 (a) If the director shall determine that a patient admitted upon an 25 application supported by medical certification, for whom there is no 26 court order authorizing retention for a specified period, is in need of 27 retention and if such patient does not agree to remain in such hospital 28 as a voluntary patient, the director shall apply to the supreme court or 29 the county court in the county where the hospital is located for an 30 order authorizing continued retention. A court order issued pursuant to 31 article seven hundred thirty of the criminal procedure law shall be 32 deemed an order of retention under this section. Such application shall 33 be made no later than sixty days from the date of involuntary admission 34 on application supported by medical certification or thirty days from 35 the date of an order denying an application for patient's release pursu- 36 ant to section 9.31, whichever is later; and the hospital is authorized 37 to retain the patient for such further period during which the hospital 38 is authorized to make such application or during which the application 39 may be pending. The director shall cause written notice of such applica- 40 tion to be given the patient and a copy thereof shall be given 41 personally or by mail to the persons required by this article to be 42 served with notice of such patient's initial admission and to the mental 43 hygiene legal service. Such notice shall state that a hearing may be 44 requested and that failure to make such a request within five days, 45 excluding Sunday and holidays, from the date that the notice was given 46 to the patient will permit the entry without a hearing of an order 47 authorizing retention. 48 § 11. Subdivision (a) of section 15.33 of the mental hygiene law, as 49 amended by chapter 789 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as 50 follows: 51 (a) If the director shall determine that a resident admitted upon an 52 application supported by medical certification, for whom there is no 53 court order authorizing retention for a specified period, is in need of 54 retention and if such resident does not agree to remain in such school 55 as a voluntary resident, the director shall apply to the supreme court 56 or the county court in the county where the school is located for an A. 5567--B 12 1 order authorizing continued retention. A court order issued pursuant to 2 article seven hundred thirty of the criminal procedure law shall be 3 deemed an order of retention under this section. Such application shall 4 be made no later than sixty days from the date of involuntary admission 5 on application supported by medical certification or thirty days from 6 the date of an order denying an application for resident's release 7 pursuant to section 15.31, whichever is later; and the school is author- 8 ized to retain the resident for such further period during which the 9 school is authorized to make such application or during which the appli- 10 cation may be pending. The director shall cause written notice of such 11 application to be given the resident and a copy thereof shall be given 12 personally or by mail to the persons required by this article to be 13 served with notice of such resident's initial admission and to the 14 mental hygiene legal service. Such notice shall state that a hearing may 15 be requested and that failure to make such a request within five days, 16 excluding Sunday and holidays, from the date that the notice was given 17 to the resident will permit the entry without a hearing of an order 18 authorizing retention. 19 § 12. Subdivision (c) of section 43.03 of the mental hygiene law, as 20 amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 21 (c) Patients receiving services while being held in the custody of the 22 commissioner pursuant to order of a criminal court, other than patients 23 committed to the department pursuant to section 330.20 of the criminal 24 procedure law, or for examination pursuant to an order of the family 25 court shall not be liable to the department for such services. Fees due 26 the department for such services shall be paid by the county in which 27 such court is located unless such services are or could be eligible for 28 payment pursuant to the federal medical care assistance program and 29 except that counties shall not be responsible for the cost of services 30 rendered patients committed to the department pursuant to section 330.20 31 of the criminal procedure law, section five hundred eight of the 32 correction law or patients committed to the department pursuant to arti- 33 cle nine, ten or fifteen of this chapter. 34 § 13. In the event that any county or any city with a population of 35 one million or more in any one year reduces payments made to the state 36 for restoration services pursuant to article 730 of the criminal proce- 37 dure law by an amount which is less than the average of such expendi- 38 tures for the previous three years, then such county or such city shall 39 utilize such savings for needed services which are identified as needed 40 in the local services plan, as defined in section 41.03 of the mental 41 hygiene law, of such county or such city. 42 § 14. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 43 have become a law.